Massachusetts, session 194th, S1628.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 112 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 4 the following sections:- 
Section 4A.  (a) For the purposes of sections 4A and 4B, the following words shall have 
the following meanings:- 
“Board of Registration in Medicine”, the board of registration in medicine established 
pursuant to section 10 of chapter 13. 
“Board of Registration in Nursing”, the board of registration in nursing established 
pursuant to section 13 of chapter 13. 
“Clinician”, a physician, nurse, physician assistant, psychologist, or independent clinical 
social worker, who is licensed to provide health services and registered in the commonwealth 
pursuant to chapter 112 to provide such services, and any other individual who is licensed to 

of 8 12 provide health services and registered in the commonwealth pursuant to chapter 112 to provide 
such services. 
“Clinician with independent practice authority”, a physician registered to practice 
medicine in the commonwealth or a nurse practitioner, psychiatric nurse mental health clinical 
specialist, or nurse anesthetist who is registered to practice medicine in the commonwealth and 
who has independent practice authority pursuant to sections 80E and 80J of said chapter 112.  
“Management services organization,” a business that provides management or 
administrative services to a health care provider or provider organization for compensation. 
“Health care practice”, a business, regardless of form, through which a clinician with 
independent practice authority licensed by the Board of Registration in Medicine or the Board of 
Registration in Nursing offers health services; provided, however, that health care practice shall 
not include any entity that holds a license issued by the department of public health pursuant to 
sections 51, 51M, 51N or 52 of chapter 111. 
“Physician”, a doctor of medicine or doctor of osteopathy who is registered to practice 
medicine in the commonwealth pursuant to section 2 of chapter 112. 
(b) A clinician with independent practice authority may practice at a health care practice 
that meets the following requirements: (1) the health care practice is wholly owned and 
controlled by one or more clinicians with independent practice authority who hold a certificate of 
registration that (i) is issued by the board of registration in medicine or the board of registration 
in nursing pursuant to the requirements of sections 2 and 80B of this chapter, and (ii) has not 
been suspended or revoked; or (2) the health care practice is conducted through a business 
organization formed as: (i) a professional corporation pursuant to chapter 156A; (ii) a nonprofit 

of 8 34 organization, a nonprofit hospital services corporation organized under chapter 176A, a nonprofit 
medical services corporation organized under chapter 176B; (iii) a limited liability company 
organized under chapter 156C; provided, however, that there are no LLC provisions limiting or 
eliminating the licensee’s liability for intentional tort or negligence; (iv) a partnership organized 
under chapter 108A, including, but not limited to, a registered limited liability partnership; 
provided, however, that the partnership has no provisions limiting or eliminating the licensee's 
liability for intentional torts or negligence; or (v) an organization similar to those organizations 
described in clauses (i) through (iv) of this subsection and organized under a comparable law of 
any other United States jurisdiction; organized under a comparable law of any other jurisdiction 
within the United States; provided, however, that all shares of the organization shall be owned by 
clinicians with independent practice authority. 
(c) It shall constitute the unauthorized practice of medicine in violation of section 6 of 
this chapter for any person or entity to own a health care practice other than a clinician with 
independent practice authority who holds a certificate of registration that is issued by the board 
of registration in medicine or the board of registration in nursing pursuant to the requirements of 
sections 2 or 80B and has not been suspended or revoked. This section shall not apply to a health 
care facility or entity that holds a license issued by the department of public health pursuant to 
sections 51, 51M, 51N or 52 of chapter 111.  
(d)(1) Nothing in this section shall prohibit a clinician with independent practice 
authority from practicing medicine as an employee of a health care facility or entity that holds a 
license issued by the department of public health pursuant to sections 51, 51M, 51N or 52 of 
chapter 111.  

of 8 56  (2) An entity that provides compensation to one or more clinicians with independent 
practice authority, including, but not limited to a health care facility licensed pursuant to sections 
51, 51M, 51N or 51, shall not directly or indirectly interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the 
professional judgment or clinical decisions of such clinicians with independent practice 
authority. Conduct prohibited under this paragraph shall include, but not be limited to, 
controlling, either directly or indirectly through discipline, punishment, threats, adverse 
employment actions, coercion, retaliation or excessive pressure, regarding: (i) the amount of time 
spent with patients, including the time permitted to triage patients in the emergency department 
or evaluate admitted patients; (ii) the time period within which a patient must be discharged; (iii) 
decisions involving the patient’s clinical status, including, but not limited to, whether the patient 
should be kept in observation status, whether the patient should receive palliative care and where 
the patient should be placed upon discharge; (iv) the diagnosis, diagnostic terminology or codes 
that are entered into the medical record; or (v) any other conduct the department of public health 
determines by regulation would interfere with, control or otherwise direct the professional 
judgement or clinical decisions of clinicians with independent practice authority. Such entities 
shall not limit the range of clinical orders available to clinicians either directly or by configuring 
the medical record to prohibit or significantly limit the clinical order options available. 
Nondisclosure or non-disparagement agreements regarding subsections (i) through (v), inclusive, 
between a clinician with independent practice authority and any person or entity shall be 
considered void and unenforceable. If a court of competent jurisdiction finds a policy, contract or 
contract provision void and unenforceable pursuant to this section, the court shall award the 
plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. Nothing in this section shall limit the ability of any 

of 8 78 person to bring any action relating to defamation, disclosure of confidential or proprietary 
information or trade secrets or similar torts.  
(e) All health care practices shall provide written certification that the health care practice 
meets the requirements in this section to the board of registration in medicine or the board of 
registration in nursing at the time of formation and on a biennial basis thereafter. If a practice’s 
owners consist of individuals registered solely with the board of registration in medicine or the 
board of registration in nursing, the practice shall provide the certification to the applicable 
board. If the practice’s owners consist of individuals registered with both boards, the practice 
shall provide the certification to the board of registration in medicine, which shall transmit a 
copy to the board of registration in nursing. Health care practices shall, at the time that such 
clinicians with independent practice authority are hired or affiliated with the practice and within 
30 days of providing certification to the applicable board pursuant to this section, provide a copy 
of the most recent certification to all clinicians with independent practice authority who: (i) 
engage in providing health services at the practice; and (ii) do not hold any ownership interest in 
the practice.  
(f) All health care practices shall file with the applicable board a registration application 
containing such information as the board may reasonably require, including, but not limited to: 
(i) the identity of the applicant and of the clinicians with independent practice authority which 
constitute the practice; (ii) any management services organization under contract with the health 
care practice; (iii) a certified copy of the health care practice’s certificate of organization, if any, 
as filed with the secretary of the commonwealth, or any applicable partnership agreement; (iv) 
the address of the health care practice; (v) the services provided by the health care practice; and 
100 (vi) any information the board, in consultation with the health policy commission and the center 

of 8 101 for health information and analysis, deems relevant for the state health plan and focused 
102 assessments pursuant to section 22 of chapter 6D and the health care resources inventory 
103 pursuant to section 9 of chapter 12C. The application shall be accompanied by a fee in an amount 
104 to be determined pursuant to section 3B of chapter 7. All health care practices registered in the 
105 commonwealth shall renew their certificates of registration with the board every 2 years. The 
106 board shall share information relevant to the state health plan and focused assessments pursuant 
107 to section 22 of chapter 6D with the commission and information relevant to the health care 
108 resources inventory pursuant to section 9 of section 12C with the center.  
109  (g) All health care practices with more than 1 clinician with independent practice 
110 authority that constitutes the practice shall designate a clinician with independent practice 
111 authority at the practice to serve as medical director; provided, however, that the designated 
112 clinician shall hold a certificate of registration that (i) is issued by the Board of Registration in 
113 Medicine or the Board of Registration in Nursing pursuant to the requirements of sections 2 or 
114 80B of this chapter that is not suspended or revoked; and (2) is present in the state and is 
115 substantially engaged in delivering care or managing the practice. The director shall be 
116 responsible for implementing policies and procedures to ensure compliance with local 
117 ordinances and state and federal statutes and regulations governing the practice of medicine or 
118 the practice of nursing, including regulations promulgated and policies established by the 
119 applicable board. The board may impose discipline against the licenses of the medical director 
120 and the clinicians with independent practice authority who own and control the health care 
121 practice for failure of the practice to comply with local ordinances and state and federal statutes 
122 and regulations governing the practice of medicine or the practice of nursing, including 
123 regulations promulgated and policies established by the applicable board.  

of 8 124  (h) The board of registration in medicine and board of registration in nursing may 
125 promulgate regulations to establish minimum requirements for the conduct of a health care 
126 practice, including, but not limited to: (i) compliance with section 4A of chapter 112; (ii) 
127 maintenance and access to medical records; and (iii) in the event of a planned closure of the 
128 health care practice or an unplanned event that prevents the health care practice from continuing 
129 operations, the development of a continuity plan to: (1) ensure access to medical records, (2) 
130 provide notice to patients; and (3) assist patients with transitioning to a new provider. If a 
131 practice’s owners consist of individuals registered solely with the board of registration in 
132 medicine or the board of registration in nursing, the practice shall comply with the applicable 
133 board’s regulations. If the practice’s owners consist of individuals registered with both boards, 
134 the practice shall comply with the regulations issued by the board of registration in medicine. 
135 Each board shall consult with the other when promulgating regulations. 
136    
137  Section 4B. (a) A health care practice shall maintain ultimate control over clinical 
138 decisions.  
139  (b) A management services organization shall not exercise control over, or be delegated 
140 the power to do, any of the following: (i) owning or otherwise determining the content of patient 
141 medical records; (ii) selecting, hiring or firing any owner of or clinician associated with the 
142 health care practice based, in whole or in part, on clinical competency or proficiency;; (iii) 
143 setting the parameters under which a practice shall enter into contractual relationships with 
144 clinicians for the delivery of care; (iv) making final decisions regarding coding and billing 

of 8 145 procedures for patient care services; or (v) approving the selection of medical equipment and 
146 medical supplies for the practice. 
147  (c) A health care practice shall maintain ultimate decision-making authority over: (i) 
148 personnel decisions involving clinicians, including, but not limited to, employment status, 
149 compensation, hours or working conditions; (ii) coding or billing decisions; (iii) the selection and 
150 use of property, including, but not limited to, real property, medical equipment or medical 
151 supplies for the delivery of patient care services; (iv) the number of patients seen in a given 
152 period of time or the amount of time spent with each patient; (v) the appropriate diagnostic test 
153 for medical conditions; (vi) the use of patient medical records; and (vii) referral decisions. 
154  (d) A violation of this section shall constitute the unauthorized practice of medicine in 
155 violation of section 6 or the unauthorized practice of nursing in violation of section 80E, 80H or 
156 80J. Any provision of a contract or agreement that has the effect of violating this section shall be 
157 void and unenforceable. If a court of competent jurisdiction finds a policy, contract or contract 
158 provision void and unenforceable pursuant to this section, the court shall award the plaintiff 
159 reasonable attorney’s fees and costs. 
160  (e) The department of public health shall promulgate regulations to effectuate the 
161 purposes of this section.